apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="w/in__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ins</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>on</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>on</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inning</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inning</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inning</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="wr/eak__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>eak</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eak</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eaks</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>eaked</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>eaked</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eaking</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eaking</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eaking</l>        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="plug__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ged</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ged</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ging</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ging</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ging</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="sl/ink__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ink</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ink</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inks</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>unk</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>unk</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inking</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inking</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inking</l>        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="dub__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>bed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>bed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>bing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>bing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>bing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bed__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ded</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ded</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ding</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ding</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ding</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="whiz__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>zes</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>zed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>zed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>zing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>zing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>zing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="program__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>med</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>med</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ming</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ming</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ming</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ag/e__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="trim"><i>trim</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="drum"><i>drum</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blob"><i>blob</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shred"><i>shred</i><par n="bed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="clog"><i>clog</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brim"><i>brim</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lag"><i>lag</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brag"><i>brag</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="whiz"><i>whiz</i><par n="whiz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rob"><i>rob</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cram"><i>cram</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dim"><i>dim</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="age"><i>ag</i><par n="ag/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bed"><i>bed</i><par n="bed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beg"><i>beg</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wag"><i>wag</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="debug"><i>debug</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="drag"><i>drag</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="drug"><i>drug</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dub"><i>dub</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="program"><i>program</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stem"><i>stem</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jog"><i>jog</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kid"><i>kid</i><par n="bed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bug"><i>bug</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rub"><i>rub</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="win"><i>w</i><par n="w/in__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grab"><i>grab</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tag"><i>tag</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
